District of Columbia statutes.
39-114

Library Collections Account.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing account the Library Collections Account (“Account”) into which shall be deposited:

(1)

All receipts from the sale of used books and other library materials;

(2)

Proceeds from the sale of library-related merchandise;

(3)

Gifts, grants, and donations designated for collections; and

(4)

Such amounts as may be appropriated for books and other library materials.

(b)

The Account shall be used solely for the purpose of procuring books and other library materials, including compact disks, electronic materials, or other records and materials, to maintain and enhance the collection of the District of Columbia Public Library.

(c)

All funds deposited into the Account, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

History

June 3, 1896, 29 Stat. 244, ch. 315, § 14
as added Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 4022(b), 59 DCR 8025
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4052(b), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 39-107.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 added this section.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “Library Collections Account” for “Books and Other Library Materials Account” in the section heading and in (a).

Temporary Legislation

Section 101(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 amended this section by striking the phrase “Books and Other Library Materials” wherever it appears and inserting the phrase “Library Collections” in its place.
Section 402(b) of D.C. Law 19-226 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of section, see § 4022(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary addition of section, see § 4022(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-413, July 25, 2012, 59 DCR 9290).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-482, October 12, 2012, 59 DCR 12478).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(b) of the Fiscal Year 2013 Budget Support Technical Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-604, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1045), applicable as of January 10, 2013.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 4052(b) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 4051 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle E of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “Library Collections Account Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.